Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6595YH (4) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2411 Section 1. Section 68A.402, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. Election year. A candidateâs committee of a candidate 3 for statewide office, the general assembly, or county office 4 shall file reports in an election year as follows: during each 5 calendar quarter, beginning with the first calendar quarter of 6 the calendar year in which a contribution is accepted or an 7 expenditure is made. Each report shall be filed not later than 8 the fifteenth day after the last day of each calendar quarter, 9 except that the report for the calendar quarter ending on 10 December 31 of the calendar year shall be filed not later than 11 January 31 of the following calendar year. 12 Report due: Covering period: 13 May 19 January 1 through May 14 14 July 19 May 15 or Wednesday 15 preceding primary 16 election through July 14 17 October 19 July 15 through October 14 18 January 19 (next October 15 or Wednesday 19 calendar year) preceding general 20 election through 21 December 31 22